Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 14. Public Officers

§ 1. Stated salaries to be paid.

All state, city, county, town and school officers, (excepting justices of the peace and constables in precincts having less than fifteen hundred population, and excepting court commissioners, boards of arbitration and notaries public) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries. The legislature shall, from time to time, fix the amount of such salaries as are not already fixed by this constitution, which shall in all cases be in proportion to the value of the services rendered and the duty performed.

Cross references. —

As to compensation of legislators, see art. 3, § 6, Wyo. Const.

For provision that compensation of legislators shall not be increased during term, see art. 3, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to prohibition of granting extra compensation to public officers, see art. 3, § 30, Wyo. Const.

As to prohibition of change in salary of public officer after elected, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

As to salary of governor and other state officers, see art. 4, § 13, Wyo. Const.

As to amount of salary of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-101

.

Powers of legislature. —

Legislature may fix minimum as well as maximum amount of salaries, or definite amount, but if legislature fixes maximum to be paid municipal officers, leaving to municipalities power to fix definite amounts to meet local conditions, that is sufficient. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Ordinarily, if legislature fixes rule under which compensation of officials in municipalities is to be fixed, that is sufficient. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Emoluments. —

The language of the several sections of this article make it apparent that the framers had in mind that there were officers who would not receive a salary but would receive “emoluments.” Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Secretary of state while acting governor was entitled to salary of both offices,

where he performed the duty of both. State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1903).

Act fixing salary of state examiner was held to operate as an appropriation

and not to require any special appropriation of each session of the legislature to keep it alive. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

Change in salaries of county officials. —

The slight variance in language between the second sentence of this section and § 3 of this article does not carry any idea or notion that in either section anything was intended regarding a change in the salaries of county officials during their term or after their election or appointment. Blackburn v. Board of County Comm'rs, 67 Wyo. 494, 226 P.2d 784,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1951).

This section does not imply that the salaries of county officers can be increased or diminished after their election and appointment, and during their term of service. Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

No change in the salary of a county clerk can be made during his term of office. Guthrie v. Board of Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 95, 50 P. 229,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1897).

Commission manager form of government. —

Provision in act providing for commission manager form of government for fixing of salaries by the council is void. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

An act providing for commission form of government which did not fix the salary of police judge is not invalid therefor. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Office manager who is under control of board of public utilities

is an employee and not an officer and his salary need not be fixed by legislature. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Fees. —

A sheriff was not entitled to retain fees received for the inspection of stock in addition to his salary, as he was in the case of services rendered in civil actions pending in courts. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

County attorney was not entitled to additional fee for prosecuting action to abate liquor nuisance. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

The state, in proceeding to abate liquor nuisance, was not entitled to tax reasonable attorney's fees, which statute allows successful complainant, as the compensation of the county attorney is covered by his salary. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

Finding by county commissioners regarding population of county precinct. —

The finding by the board of county commissioners that a county precinct contained 1,500 population for the purpose of salary of a justice of the peace will not be disturbed in the absence of proof that it erred. Davis v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 477, 35 P. 467,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1894).

Defenses in action for salary by clerk of district court. —

It is no defense to an action by the clerk of a district court for salary that he has failed or refused to account for fees received by him, since there is a separate proceeding provided for compelling such accounting, by enforcement of liability on his official bond. Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1893).

The fact that, after the qualification of the clerk of the district court, one of the sureties on his bond died, and he failed to furnish a new bond, though requested by the county board so to do, is no defense to an action for his salary, if there was no declaration by competent authority that the office was vacant, and no steps were taken to oust him from office. Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1893).

Cited

in

Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1899).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For case note, “Local Government Law—Platte County's Cost of Living Adjustment: Is It an Unconstitutional In-Term Adjustment of an Elected Officer's Salary?,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 549 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutory classifications based on population — governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 ALR3d 538.

§ 2. Fees.

The legislature shall provide by law the fees which may be demanded by justices of the peace and constables in precincts having less than fifteen hundred population, and of court commissioners, boards of arbitration and notaries public, which fees the said officers shall accept as their full compensation. But all other state, county, city, town and school officers shall be required by law to keep a true and correct account of all fees collected by them, and to pay the same into the proper treasury when collected, and the officer whose duty it is to collect such fees shall be held responsible, under his bond, for neglect to collect the same. (As amended by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 770.)

Cross references. —

As to fees of court commissioners, see §

5-3-308

.

For provisions abolishing office of constable, see §

5-4-401

.

As to fees of sheriff for services rendered in civil cases, see §

18-3-608

.

As to fees of notaries public, see §

32-1-112

.

Emoluments. —

The language of the several sections of this article make it apparent that the framers had in mind that there were officers who would not receive a salary but would receive “emoluments.” Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Inspection of stock by sheriff. —

A sheriff was not entitled to retain fees received for inspection of stock in addition to his salary, as he was in case of services rendered in civil actions pending in courts. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

Action by county attorney to abate liquor nuisance. —

County attorney was not entitled to additional fee for prosecuting action to abate liquor nuisance. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

The state, in proceeding to abate liquor nuisance, was not entitled to tax reasonable attorney's fees which statute allows successful complainant, as the compensation of the county attorney is covered by his salary. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

Defense in action for salary by clerk of district court. —

It is no defense to an action by a clerk of a district court for salary that he had failed or refused to account for fees received by him, since there is a separate proceeding provided for compelling such accounting, by enforcement of liability on his official bond. Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1893).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1892); Davis v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 477, 35 P. 467,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1894).

§ 3. Legislature to designate county offices and fix salaries of county officers.

The legislature shall by law designate county offices and shall, from time to time, fix the salaries of county officers, which shall in all cases be in proportion to the value of the services rendered and the duties performed. (As amended by Laws 1943, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 167.)

Cross references. —

As to county officers generally, see §§

18-3-101

to

18-3-907

.

As to salaries, fees and expenses generally, see §§

18-3-107

to

18-3-110

.

Nature of duties imposed by law. —

When duties are imposed upon a public officer, such as a county clerk, by law rather than by some appointing power, such duties are usually governmental and not ministerial. Denver Buick v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970).

County assessors are not constitutional officers,

so that the legislature may abolish any of the duties of the office or change the duties to be performed. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Emoluments. —

The language of the several sections of this article make it apparent that the framers had in mind that there were officers who would not receive a salary but would receive “emoluments.” Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Fees. —

A sheriff was not entitled to retain fees received for the inspection of stock in addition to his salary, as he was in the case of services rendered in civil actions pending in courts. Messenger v. Board of Comm'rs, 19 Wyo. 309, 117 P. 126,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1911).

County attorney was not entitled to additional fee for prosecuting action to abate liquor nuisance. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

The state, in proceeding to abate liquor nuisance, was not entitled to tax reasonable attorney's fees, which statute allows successful complainant, as the compensation of the county attorney is covered by his salary. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

Changes in salary. —

Under this section and a statute prescribing the “annual” salary of treasurers of the counties, the salary must continue same throughout an official year, and cannot be made more or less for the last than the first part. Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

No change can be made in the salary of a county clerk during his term. Guthrie v. Board of Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 95, 50 P. 229,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1897).

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Grand Island & N.W.R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

, 34 L.R.A. 835 (1896); In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Local Government Law—Platte County's Cost of Living Adjustment: Is It an Unconstitutional In-Term Adjustment of an Elected Officer's Salary?,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 549 (2000).

§ 4. Deputies.

The legislature shall provide by general law for such deputies as the public necessities may require, and shall fix their compensation.

Cross references. —

As to deputies to state officers generally, see §

9-1-101

.

As to deputies to county officers, see §§

18-3-111

,

18-3-112

.

Deputy county clerk. —

Where board of county commissioners did not consent to appointment of deputy clerk under law providing county clerk in such county might appoint deputy with consent of board, but paid deputy's salary, payment may constitute ratification of the appointment, but board may withdraw its consent at any time. Griggs v. Board of Comm'rs, 5 Wyo. 274, 40 P. 304,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1892).

§ 5. Who are county officers referred to by section 3.

Any county officers performing the duties usually performed by the officers named in this article shall be considered as referred to by section 3 of this article, regardless of the title by which their offices may hereafter be designated.

County assessors are not constitutional officers,

so that the legislature may abolish any of the duties of the office or change the duties to be performed. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 6. Consolidation of offices.

Whenever practicable the legislature may, and whenever the same can be done without detriment to the public service, shall consolidate offices in state, county and municipalities respectively, and whenever so consolidated, the duties of such additional office shall be performed under an ex officio title.

Office of county assessor may be consolidated with that of county treasurer

under the provisions hereof. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).